California statutes. Fish and Game Code
If a petition is accepted by the commission for consideration, all reasonable attempts shall be made to notify affected and interested parties and to solicit data and comments on the petitioned action from as many persons as is practicable. In addition to commission efforts to provide notification through distribution of the commission agenda and minutes pursuant to Section 2078, the department shall immediately undertake efforts to notify affected and interested parties. Methods of notification may include, but are not limited to, correspondence, newspaper notices, and press releases, and notification shall include notice to owners of that land which may provide habitat essential to the continued existence of the species, unless the director determines that ownership is so widespread, fragmented, or complex as to make individual notice impractical.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1162, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

2074.6.

(a) If the commission accepts a petition for consideration, the department shall promptly commence a review of the status of the species concerned in the petition.

(b) Within 12 months of the date of publication of a notice of acceptance of a petition for consideration pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (e) of Section 2074.2, the department shall produce and make publicly available on the department’s internet website a final written peer reviewed report, based upon the best scientific information available to the department, which indicates whether the petitioned action is warranted, which includes a preliminary identification of the habitat that may be essential to the continued existence of the species, and which recommends management activities and other
 recommendations for recovery of the species.

(c) Prior to releasing the final written report, the department shall have a draft status review report prepared and independently peer reviewed, and upon receiving the peer reviewers’ input, shall evaluate and respond in writing to the independent peer review and shall amend the draft status review report as appropriate.

(d) The revised report shall be posted on the department’s internet website for a minimum of 30 days for public review prior to the hearing scheduled pursuant to Section 2075.

(e) The commission may grant an extension of up to six months if the director determines an extension is necessary to complete independent peer review of the report, and to provide a minimum of 30 days for public review of the peer reviewed report prior to the public hearing
 specified in Section 2075.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 37.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

2074.8.

(a) This article does not impose any duty or obligation for, or otherwise require, the commission or the department to undertake independent studies or other assessments of any species when reviewing a petition and its attendant documents and comments.

(b) The director may approve an extension of time for completion of the status report if necessary for the purposes of obtaining independent peer review pursuant to Section 2074.6.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 38.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

2075.

The commission shall schedule the petition for final consideration at its next available meeting after receipt of the departmental report provided pursuant to Section 2074.6 and shall distribute the pending agenda for that meeting pursuant to Section 2078. The commission shall make the department’s report, or copies thereof, which was provided, pursuant to Section 2074.6, available for review upon request.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1162, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

2075.5.

(a) At the meeting scheduled pursuant to Section 2075, the commission shall hold a public hearing on the petition and shall receive information, written or otherwise, and oral testimony. After the conclusion of oral testimony from the commission and department staff, the petitioner, or any other person, the commission may close the public hearing and the administrative record for the commission’s decision pursuant to this section.

(b) After the commission closes the public hearing, the administrative record for the commission’s decision is closed and it shall not be reopened except as provided in subdivision (c). Once the public hearing is closed, a person shall not submit further information to the commission for consideration on that petition and the commission
 shall not accept any further information for consideration on that petition except as provided in subdivision (c).

(c) The administrative record for the commission’s decision pursuant to this section shall not be reopened once the commission closes the public hearing unless one of the following occurs before the commission’s decision:

(1) There is a change in state or federal law or regulation that has a direct and significant impact on the commission’s determination as to whether the petitioned action is warranted.

(2) The commission determines that it requires further information to evaluate whether the petitioned action is warranted. If the commission makes that determination during its deliberation, the commission may request, on the record at the scheduled meeting or at a continued meeting, further information
 on any issue relevant to making its determination as to whether the petitioned action is warranted. Any request by the commission pursuant to this paragraph shall specify a date by which the information must be submitted to the commission and shall serve to reopen the administrative record for the limited purpose of receiving further information relating to the issues specified by the commission in the request. Commission and department staff, the petitioner, or any other person may submit information in response to a request pursuant to this paragraph.

(d) The commission, in its discretion, may either close the public hearing and continue the meeting on the petition for the purpose of deliberation or continue both the public hearing and the meeting on the petition to a subsequent date that is no later than 90 days after the meeting scheduled pursuant to Section 2075, and subject to applicable notice and agenda requirements. If the commission
 closes the public hearing but continues the meeting for the purpose of deliberation, a person shall not submit, and the commission shall not receive, further information relating to the petition except as provided in subdivision (c).

(e) At the meeting scheduled pursuant to Section 2075, or at a continued meeting scheduled pursuant to subdivision (d), the commission shall make one of the following findings based on the best available scientific information:

(1) The petitioned action is not warranted, in which case the finding shall be entered in the public records of the commission and the petitioned species shall be removed from the list of candidate species maintained pursuant to Section 2074.2.

(2) The petitioned action is warranted, or the petitioned action is not warranted but listing the petitioned species at a
 different status than that requested by the petitioner is warranted, in which case the commission shall, within 30 days of adopting written findings, publish a notice of that finding and shall add the species to, or remove the species from, the list of endangered species or the list of threatened species. Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code does not apply to the change in status of a species pursuant to this article. The commission shall submit the change in status to the Office of Administrative Law for filing with the Secretary of State and publication in the California Code of Regulations. The commission shall use underline or italics to indicate additions to, and strikeout to indicate deletions from, the California Code of Regulations to reflect the change in status.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 329, Sec. 6.   (SB 473)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

2076.

Any finding pursuant to this article is subject to judicial review under Section 1094.5 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 39.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

2076.5.

Notwithstanding Sections 2071 to 2075.5, inclusive, the commission may adopt a regulation that adds a species to the list of endangered species or to the list of threatened species as an emergency regulation pursuant to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 399) of Division 1 if the commission finds that there is any emergency posing a significant threat to the continued existence of the species. The commission shall notify affected or interested persons of the adoption of the emergency regulation pursuant to the methods described in Section 2074.4.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 546, Sec. 23.   (SB 1473)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

2076.7.

(a) For the purposes of this section only, “federally listed species” means any species, subspecies, distinct population segment, or evolutionarily significant unit that is native to California, that was, as of January 1, 2025, listed or was a candidate for listing under the federal Endangered Species Act of 1973 (16 U.S.C. Sec. 1531 et seq.), and that is not currently protected under Chapter 1.5 (commencing with Section 2050) of Division 3.

(b) For purposes of this section only, “a decrease in endangered or threatened species protections by the federal government” shall mean any action that satisfies both of the following:

(1) That is an act of the United States Congress to amend the federal Endangered Species Act of 1973 (16 U.S.C. 1531 et seq.), a rulemaking or amendment to regulations by either the United States Fish and Wildlife Service or the National Marine Fisheries Service, an executive order by the President of the United States, or an action by the Endangered Species Committee, established by Section 1536(e) of Title 16 of the United States Code.

(2) That reduces the level of protection provided to one or more federally listed species by, among other actions, delisting a species, changing the listing status of a species from endangered to threatened, eliminating or changing the prohibitions on take, or decreasing the amount of mitigation required for permits or other approvals.

(c) To ensure no backsliding as a result of a decrease in endangered or threatened species protections by the federal government, the department shall take the following actions:

(1) The department shall monitor actions by the United States Congress, the United States Fish and Wildlife Service, the National Marine Fisheries Service, the President of the United States, and the Endangered Species Committee that could result in a decrease in endangered or threatened species protections by the federal government.

(2) For any action that the department determines will result in a decrease in endangered or threatened species protections by the federal government, the department shall determine whether both of the following have occurred:

(A) The decrease in endangered or threatened species protections by the federal government will have a substantial impact on one or more federally listed species within California.

(B) Provisional listing as a candidate under Chapter 1.5 (commencing with Section 2050) of Division 3 could significantly reduce any such substantial impact.

(3) If the department determines that one or more federally listed species will be substantially impacted by a decrease in endangered or threatened species protections by the federal government and that listing as a provisional candidate species could significantly reduce such impacts, the department shall publish written findings in the California Regulatory Notice Register regarding the
 determinations in paragraph (2) along with a statement that the affected species is deemed a provisional candidate species pursuant to Chapter 1.5 (commencing with Section 2050) of Division 3 and shall be added to the commission’s list as a provisional candidate species.

(d) Any species added to the list of provisional candidate species pursuant to subdivision (c) shall remain a provisional candidate species until December 31, 2031. Sections 2074.4 to 2076, inclusive, shall not apply to any species added to the list of provisional candidate species pursuant to subdivision (c).

(e) Any species added to the list of provisional candidate species pursuant to subdivision (c) may be removed from the list by the commission,
 pursuant to this article.

(f) (1) The department shall report any federally listed species that are listed as provisional candidate species pursuant to subdivision (c) at the next public meeting of the commission following the provisional candidacy determination.

(2) Notwithstanding subdivision (d), if the commission determines a federally listed species that is listed as a provisional candidate species pursuant to subdivision (c) may warrant ongoing protection pursuant to Chapter 1.5 (commencing
 with Section 2050) of Division 3, the commission may direct the department to prepare a status review pursuant to 2074.6 and proceed with the process for listing the species as endangered or threatened under Chapter 1.5 (commencing with Section 2050) of Division 3.

(g) Provisional candidate species shall have the same protections afforded to candidate species pursuant to this chapter.

(h) The California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing
 with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code) shall not apply to any actions taken by the department or the commission pursuant to this section.

(i) It is the intent of the Legislature that the department and the commission be provided sustainable funding sufficient to fully implement this section and the resulting obligations.

(j) The department shall notify affected and interested persons of any determination to make a federally listed species a provisional candidate species pursuant to subdivision (c) using the methods described in Section 2074.4.

(k) During the pendency of a provisional candidacy for a species pursuant to this section, an entity operating under a federal authorization for take, in effect on or before January 19, 2025, for species listed pursuant to the provisional candidacy, shall not be liable for criminal or civil penalties under this article as long as the entities are in full compliance with their
 federal biological opinion, incidental take permit, incidental take statement, conservation benefit agreement, or rules promulgated under subsection (d) of Section 4 of the federal Endangered Species Act of 1973 (16 U.S.C. Sec. 1531 et seq.).

(l) Nothing in this section is intended to nor shall it be interpreted to affect the duties of the commission or the department as set forth in Article 2 (commencing with Section 2070) of Chapter 1.5 of Division 3 with respect to processing petitions submitted pursuant to Section 2072.3.

(m) This section shall become inoperative on December 31, 2031, and, as of January 1, 2032, is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 638, Sec. 2.   (AB 1319)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Inoperative December 31, 2031, by its own provisions.   Repealed as of January 1, 2032, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

2077.

(a) Upon a specific appropriation of funds by the Legislature, the department shall, or if other funding is available, in the absence of a specific appropriation, may, review species listed as an endangered species or as a threatened species every five years to determine if the conditions that led to the original listing are still present. The review shall be conducted based on information that is consistent with the information specified in Section 2072.3 and that is the best scientific information available to the department. The review shall include a review of the identification of the habitat that may be essential to the continued existence of the species and the department’s recommendations for management activities and other recommendations for recovery of the species. The department
 shall notify any person who has notified the commission, in writing with their address, of their interest, and the department may notify any other person.

(b) Review pursuant to subdivision (a) of species that are listed by both the commission and the United States Department of the Interior shall be conducted in conjunction with the five-year review process of the United States Department of the Interior.

(c) Initial review of those species listed by the commission before January 1, 1982, that are not listed by the federal government shall be undertaken and completed by July 1, 1987. Initial review of those species listed by the commission after January 1, 1982, that are not listed by the federal government shall be undertaken and completed within five years of the date the species was originally listed by the commission.

(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, the commission or the department may review a species at any time based upon a petition or upon other data available to the department and the commission.

(e) The department shall report in writing to the commission the results of its five-year review for each listed species. The commission shall treat any report of the department under this subdivision that contains a recommendation to add a species to, or remove a species from, the list of endangered species or the list of threatened species as a department recommendation submitted pursuant to Section 2072.7.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 329, Sec. 7.   (SB 473)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

2078.

(a) To provide all interested persons access to information and notification of pending listing or delisting actions, the commission shall distribute the related agenda of pending actions and those portions of its minutes of actions taken under this article to any individuals who have notified the commission, in writing with their address, of their interest. This notification shall be published in the California Regulatory Notice Register and shall meet the requirements of public notice as required for commission action under Section 2073.3, 2074, 2074.2, 2075, or 2077. 

(b) The commission may impose an annual fee on those persons who request inclusion on the list to be notified in order to offset the cost of establishing and maintaining the list, and preparing and mailing the notices. Fees received pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the Fish and Game Preservation Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 974, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

2079.

The department shall, by January 30 of every third year, beginning January 30, 1986, prepare a report summarizing the status of all state listed endangered, threatened, and candidate species, and shall post the report on the commission’s Internet Web site. This report shall include, but not be limited to, a listing of those species designated as endangered, threatened, and candidate species, a discussion of the current status of endangered, threatened, or candidate species, and the timeframes for the review of listed species pursuant to this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 728, Sec. 44.   (SB 71)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

2079.1.

(a) Upon a specific appropriation of funds by the Legislature, or if funding is otherwise available, the department may develop and implement nonregulatory recovery plans for the conservation and survival of species listed as an endangered species or as a threatened species, unless the department finds that the recovery plan will not promote the conservation of the species.

(b) The department, in developing and implementing recovery plans, shall, to the extent practicable, give priority to those endangered or threatened species, without regard to taxonomic classification, that are most likely to benefit from a recovery plan, particularly those species populations that are, or may be, significantly affected by anticipated land use changes,
 climate change, or changes in aquatic conditions.

(c) Each recovery plan shall be based on the best available scientific information and shall, at a minimum, include all of the following:

(1) A description of site-specific management actions necessary to achieve the recovery plan’s goal for the conservation of the species.

(2) Objective, measurable criteria that, when achieved, would result in a determination, in accordance with the provisions of this section, that the species be removed from the list of endangered species or the list of threatened species, as applicable.

(3) Estimates of the time required and the cost to carry out those measures needed to achieve the goal of the recovery plan and to achieve intermediate steps toward that goal.

(d) The department, in developing and implementing a recovery plan, may consider data and appropriate information from public and private agencies and institutions, and other qualified persons, in addition to data and appropriate information derived from the public process required pursuant to subdivision (g).

(e) The department may, in its discretion, adopt, or may adopt with revisions, an existing federal recovery plan for a species described in subdivision (a) that is also listed as an endangered species or a threatened species pursuant to Section 4 of the federal Endangered Species Act of 1973 (16 U.S.C. Sec. 1533) if the department finds that the recovery plan is consistent with the provisions of this section.

(f) Subject to subdivision (a), and pursuant to subdivision (g), the department shall adopt guidelines and
 criteria to aid in the implementation of this section. Upon adoption, the department shall post the guidelines and criteria on its Internet Web site.

(g) Development of a recovery plan pursuant to subdivision (a), and adoption of guidelines and criteria pursuant to subdivision (f), shall be through a public process including at least one public meeting at which the department provides landowners, local governments, and interested members of the public the opportunity for input. The public meeting may be in conjunction with a meeting of the commission. In the case of a recovery plan, the public meeting shall be held in the recovery planning area.

(h) Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code does not apply to the development, adoption, or amendment of guidelines, criteria, or recovery plans pursuant to this
 section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 329, Sec. 8.   (SB 473)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Taking, Importation, Exportation, or Sale [2080. - 2085.]

2080.

No person or public agency shall import into this state, export out of this state, or take, possess, purchase, or sell within this state, any species, or any part or product thereof, that the commission determines to be an endangered species or a threatened species, or attempt any of those acts, except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the Native Plant Protection Act (Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 1900) of this code), or the California Desert Native Plants Act (Division 23 (commencing with Section 80001) of the Food and Agricultural Code).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 329, Sec. 9.   (SB 473)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

2080.1.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, or Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 1900) or Chapter 11 (commencing with Section 1925) of Division 2, but subject to subdivision (c), if any person obtains from the United States Secretary of the Interior or the United States Secretary of Commerce an incidental take statement pursuant to Section 7 of the federal Endangered Species Act of 1973 (16 U.S.C. Sec. 1536) or an incidental take permit pursuant to Section 10 of that federal act (16 U.S.C. Sec. 1539) that authorizes the taking of an endangered species or a threatened species that is listed pursuant to Section 4 of that federal act (16 U.S.C. Sec. 1533) and that is an endangered species, threatened species, or a candidate species pursuant to this chapter, no further
 authorization or approval is necessary under this chapter for that person to take that endangered species, threatened species, or candidate species identified in, and in accordance with, the incidental take statement or incidental take permit, if that person does all of the following:

(1) Notifies the director in writing that the person has received an incidental take statement or an incidental take permit issued pursuant to the federal Endangered Species Act of 1973 (16 U.S.C. Sec. 1531 et seq.).

(2) Includes in the notice to the director a copy of the incidental take statement or incidental take permit.

(3) Includes with the notice payment of the permit application fee required pursuant to Section 2081.2.

(b) Upon receipt of the notice specified in
 paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), the director shall immediately have published in the General Public Interest section of the California Regulatory Notice Register the receipt of that notice.

(c) Within 30 days after the director has received the notice described in subdivision (a) that an incidental take statement or an incidental take permit has been issued pursuant to the federal Endangered Species Act of 1973 (16 U.S.C. Sec. 1531 et seq.), the director shall determine whether the incidental take statement or incidental take permit is consistent with this chapter. If the director determines within that 30-day period, based upon substantial evidence, that the incidental take statement or incidental take permit is not consistent with this chapter, then the taking of that species may only be authorized pursuant to this chapter.

(d) The director shall immediately publish the
 determination pursuant to subdivision (c) in the General Public Interest section of the California Regulatory Notice Register.

(e) Unless deleted or extended by a later enacted statute that is chaptered before the date this section is repealed, this section shall remain in effect only until, and is repealed on, the effective date of an amendment to Section 7 or Section 10 of the federal Endangered Species Act of 1973 (16 U.S.C. Secs. 1536 and 1539) that alters the requirements for issuing an incidental take statement or an incidental take permit, as applicable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 329, Sec. 10.   (SB 473)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Repealed conditionally by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

2080.2.

The Legislature finds and declares the following:

(a) The historic settlement approved by Congress in the San Joaquin River Restoration Settlement Act (Part I of Subtitle A of Title X of Public Law 111-11) directs the federal government to reintroduce spring run Chinook salmon to the San Joaquin River. In approving the settlement and the new statutory provisions governing the reintroduction of California central valley spring run Chinook salmon, Congress found that the implementation of the settlement, to resolve 18 years of contentious litigation regarding restoration of the San Joaquin River and the reintroduction of the salmon, was a unique and unprecedented circumstance. The settlement also provides that nothing in the
 settlement diminishes the statutory or regulatory protections under the federal Endangered Species Act of 1973 (16 U.S.C. Sec. 1531 et seq.) nor does it establish a precedent with respect to any other application of the federal act.

(b) Central valley spring run Chinook salmon have been listed since 1999 as a threatened species under this chapter and were still listed as of January 1, 2011.

(c) Restoring spring run Chinook salmon to the San Joaquin River is intended to further the conservation and recovery of the species.

(d) Consistent with the unique and historic circumstances that led to the settlement, nothing in Section 2080.2, 2080.3, or 2080.4 is intended to create any precedent as to future application of this chapter, nor do Sections 2080.2, 2080.3, or 2080.4 otherwise modify other existing statutes or legal
 obligations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 291, Sec. 1.   (SB 1349)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

2080.3.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, if any person obtains from the Secretary of Commerce an enhancement of survival permit pursuant to Section 1539(a)(1)(A) of Title 16 of the United States Code that authorizes the taking of spring run Chinook salmon (Oncorhynchus tshawytscha) in order to establish or maintain an experimental population in the San Joaquin River pursuant to subsection (j) of that section and the San Joaquin River Restoration Settlement Act (Part I of Subtitle A of Title X of Public Law 111-11), no further authorization or approval is necessary under this chapter for that person to take that species as identified in, and in accordance with, the enhancement of survival permit, if all of the following
 requirements are met:

(1) That person shall notify the director in writing that the person has received an enhancement of survival permit and include in the notification a copy of the permit.

(2) Upon receipt of the notice specified in paragraph (1), the director shall immediately have the notice published in the General Public Interest section of the California Regulatory Notice Register.

(3) Within 30 days after the director has received the notice specified in paragraph (1), the director shall determine whether the enhancement of survival permit will further the conservation of the species. As used in this paragraph, “conservation” has the same meaning as defined in Section 2061.

(4) The director shall immediately have the determination pursuant to paragraph (3) published in the General Public Interest section of the California Regulatory Notice Register.

(b) The timing and extent of a take authorization under this section shall be limited to the terms in the federal enhancement of survival permit and shall expire upon the expiration of the federal permit.

(c) This section shall remain in effect only until the effective date of an amendment to Section 1539 of Title 16 of the United States Code that alters the requirements for issuing an enhancement of survival permit, as applicable, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 80, Sec. 46.   (SB 1525)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed conditionally by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

2080.4.

(a) If a population of spring run Chinook salmon in the San Joaquin River is designated as an experimental population under subsection (j) of Section 1539 of Title 16 of the United States Code, no further authorization or approval is necessary under this chapter for any person to incidentally take members of that experimental population, if all of the following requirements are met:

(1) The Secretary of Commerce has published regulations in the Federal Register specifying management restrictions, protective measures, prohibitions, and exceptions to the prohibitions for the designated experimental population of spring run Chinook salmon in the San Joaquin River.

(2) The director has determined, in writing, that the management restrictions, protective measures, prohibitions and exceptions to prohibitions contained in the regulations specified in paragraph (1) meet the requirements in subdivision (b).

(3) The action or activity that results in incidental take of the designated experimental population is authorized by the regulations published in the Federal Register.

(b) The director shall issue the determination described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), if the director finds that the federal regulations described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) meet all of the following criteria:

(1) The federal regulations will further the conservation of the spring run Chinook salmon. As used in this paragraph,
 “conservation” has the same meaning as defined in Section 2061.

(2) The federal regulations contain all reasonably feasible measures to avoid and minimize the impacts of any taking allowed by the regulation.

(3) The federal regulations will not jeopardize the continued existence or recovery of spring run Chinook salmon, and will not jeopardize the restoration of spring run Chinook salmon in the San Joaquin River.

(c) If the director determines that the federal regulations described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) are not consistent with this chapter, or if the action or activity that results in incidental take is not authorized in those federal regulations, then the incidental take of members of the designated experimental population may only be authorized pursuant to this chapter.

(d) The director shall publish the determination, pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), and subdivision (b), in the General Public Interest section of the California Regulatory Notice Register.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 291, Sec. 3.   (SB 1349)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

2080.5.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, if any person obtains from the Secretary of Commerce or the Secretary of the Interior an enhancement of survival permit pursuant to Section 1539(a)(1)(A) of Title 16 of the United States Code that authorizes the taking of an endangered species or a threatened species that is listed pursuant to Section 1533 of Title 16 of the United States Code and that is an endangered species, threatened species, or candidate species pursuant to this chapter in order to establish or maintain an experimental population, no further authorization or approval is necessary under this chapter for that person to take that endangered species, threatened species, or candidate species identified in, and in accordance with, the enhancement of survival permit, if all of the
 following requirements are met:

(1) That person shall notify the director in writing that the person has received an enhancement of survival permit and include in the notification a copy of the permit.

(2) Upon receipt of the notice specified in paragraph (1), the director shall immediately have the notice published in the General Public Interest section of the California Regulatory Notice Register.

(3) Within 30 days after the director has received the notice specified in paragraph (1), the director determines the enhancement of survival permit will further the conservation of the species. As used in this paragraph, “conservation” has the same meaning as defined in Section 2061.

(4) The director shall immediately have the determination pursuant to
 paragraph (3) published in the General Public Interest section of the California Regulatory Notice Register.

(b) The timing and extent of a take authorization under this section shall be limited to the terms in the federal enhancement of survival permit and shall expire upon the expiration of the federal permit.

(c) (1) This section shall remain in effect only until the effective date of an amendment to Section 1539 of Title 16 of the United States Code that alters the requirements for issuing an enhancement of survival permit, as applicable, and as of that date is repealed.

(2) If the director becomes aware that this section has been repealed pursuant to this subdivision, the director shall notify the Legislature of that fact pursuant to Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 276, Sec. 1.   (AB 1133)   Effective January 1, 2018.   Repealed on date prescribed by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

2080.6.

(a) For purposes of this chapter, “experimental population” means any population nonessential to the continued existence of an endangered, threatened, or candidate species, including any eggs, propagules, individuals, or offspring arising solely therefrom, that the Secretary of the Interior or the Secretary of Commerce designates as an experimental population pursuant to Section 1539(j) of Title 16 of the United States Code.

(b) If a population of a species is an experimental population, no further authorization or approval is necessary under this chapter for any person to incidentally take members of that experimental population, if all of the following requirements are met:

(1) The Secretary of the Interior or the Secretary of Commerce has published regulations in the Federal Register for the designated experimental population as required by Section 1539(j) of Title 16 of the United States Code.

(2) The director has determined, in writing, that the regulations specified in paragraph (1) meet the requirements in subdivision (c).

(3) The action or activity that results in incidental take of the designated experimental population is authorized by the regulations published in the Federal Register.

(c) The director shall issue the determination described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b), if the director finds that the federal regulations described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) meet all of the following criteria:

(1) The federal regulations will further the conservation of the species. As used in this paragraph, “conservation” has the same meaning as defined in Section 2061.

(2) The federal regulations contain measures to avoid and minimize the impacts of any taking allowed by the regulation.

(3) The federal regulations will not jeopardize the continued existence or recovery of the species.

(d) If the director determines that the federal regulations described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) are not consistent with this chapter, or if the action or activity that results in incidental take is not authorized in those federal regulations, the incidental take of members of the designated experimental population may only be authorized pursuant to the other provisions of this chapter.

(e) The director shall publish the determination, pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b), and subdivision (d), in the General Public Interest section of the California Regulatory Notice Register.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 276, Sec. 2.   (AB 1133)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

2080.7.

It is the intent of the Legislature that, before the introduction of an experimental population, as defined in Section 2080.6, onto land or into waters of this state, the department should undertake appropriate public outreach, including public meetings, in an effort to inform the public about the proposed introduction of the experimental population and its potential effects, if any, on ongoing human activities. To the extent practicable, this public outreach should include inviting other public boards, departments, or agencies that may have a regulatory or other role regarding the experimental population to collaborate with the department. Nothing in this section shall be construed to modify any other law or legal obligation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 276, Sec. 3.   (AB 1133)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

2081.

The department may authorize acts that are otherwise prohibited pursuant to Section 2080, as follows:
